District of Columbia statutes.
34-1522

Recovery of CREF implementation costs.

Pursuant to §§ 34-1101 and 34-901, the electric company may seek recovery of any costs associated with the implementation of this chapter in a base rate case. In a base rate case filing that includes recovery of such costs, the electric company shall include in its filing with the Commission any benefits and costs to the electric company. Any recovery of the net costs by the electric company approved by the Commission shall occur solely through a rate assessment of the subscribers.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 122
as added Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-47, § 2(e), 60 DCR 15138

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-47 added this section.